New Mexico, session 2026, HB198.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF NEW MEXICO: SECTION 1. APPROPRIATION.--Two million dollars ($2,000,000) is appropriated from the general fund to the department of health for expenditure in fiscal year 2027 to provide behavioral health treatment and training to first responders. Any unexpended balance remaining at the end of fiscal year 2027 shall revert to the general fund. .232749.1